California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
An alternate member of the council shall sit as a voting member of the council if the member for whom he or she is an alternate does not attend any meeting of the council. When so serving, the alternate member has all of the powers, duties, liabilities, and immunities of the member in whose place he or she is serving, except that the alternate to the chair or vice chair shall not perform the functions of those offices.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1151, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

78496.

The Legislature finds and declares that fishermen, receivers, processors, wholesalers, or exporters appointed to the council pursuant to this article are intended to represent and further the interest of the California commercial fisheries industry, and that this representation and furtherance is intended to serve the public interest. Accordingly, the Legislature finds and declares that, with respect to persons who are appointed to the council, the particular agricultural industry concerned is tantamount to, and constitutes, the public generally within the meaning of Section 87103 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1151, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Powers and Duties [78500. - 78504.]

78500.

The duties of the council shall be advisory, except as to those duties that may be delegated to it by the secretary or as otherwise designated in this chapter. The council may, subject to the approval of the secretary, exercise any of the following powers that may be delegated to the council by the secretary:

(a) To recommend to the secretary regulations that relate to the administration and enforcement of this chapter.

(b) To investigate all matters that affect the administration of this chapter, and to report violations of this chapter to the secretary.

(c) To employ and, at its pleasure, discharge, a manager and any other employees it deems necessary, and to prescribe their duties and powers and fix their compensation. 

(d) To contract for the services of any person. 

(e) To establish offices and incur expenses incidental thereto. 

(f) To make contracts and other agreements to research, develop, market, and promote the sale of seafood and seafood products from fisheries, as defined in Section 78407, and landed in California, on either a local, state, national, or international basis.

(g) (1) To cooperate with any other local, state, or national commission, organization, or agency, whether voluntary or created by state or federal law, which is engaged in work or activities similar to the work and activities of the council, and to recommend to the secretary the making of contracts and agreements with those organizations or agencies for carrying on joint programs of education, communication, research, publicity, and advertising.

(2) To recommend to the secretary the making of contracts and agreements with other councils, commodity commissions, or producer organizations for joint programs of publicity and advertising where those products are compatible with the promotion of seafood and seafood products from fisheries, as defined in Section 78407, and landed in California.

(3) In matters of research, to cooperate with organizations of recognized professional standing that are adequately equipped with facilities for the research that is contemplated.

(h) To recommend or contract for scientific research to effectuate the declared purposes of this chapter.

(i) To recommend or contract for the development of voluntary product quality standards.

(j) To promote accurate labeling of California seafood as a means to educate consumers and the public about the benefits of California seafood.

(k) To receive, invest, and disburse funds pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 78550).

(l) To allocate funds to agencies not specifically or solely engaged in carrying on research or promotion for seafood, if the council and the secretary are satisfied that those allocations will be beneficial to the California commercial fisheries and will tend to effectuate the declared purposes of this chapter.

(m) To establish and regulate the permissive use of an official brand, service mark, trade name, label, or other distinctive designation of grade, quality, condition, or other promotional or educational description. Permissive use of any such official designation shall be limited to producers, handlers, or other persons designated by the council who are in compliance with all regulations or rules established by the council for use of the designation. Any designation established pursuant to this section shall not be construed as a private brand or trade name.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 726, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

78501.

The council shall keep books, records, and accounts of all of its transactions, dealings, contracts, agreements, funds, and expenditures that it deems necessary. The books, records, and accounts shall at all times be open to inspection and audit by the director.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1151, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

78502.

A member, alternate, agent, or employee of the council shall not do any of the following:

(a) Appear before any legislative committee of the state or federal government as a representative of the council unless requested to do so by that committee. 

(b) Lobby in any manner as a representative of the council.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1151, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

78503.

Funds which are collected pursuant to this chapter shall not be used for political contributions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1151, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

78504.

The council shall prepare, annually, summarized statements of the activities in which it has been engaged in the previous annual period, and of the activities in which it proposes to engage in the ensuing annual period. The statements shall be made available to all marketing associations, organizations of fishermen and receivers, processors, wholesalers, and exporters, and individuals that request them in writing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1151, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Education, Research, and Public Information Programs [78525. - 78527.]

78525.

The secretary shall conduct, or may cause the council to conduct, programs of education, research, or public information, that are designed to accomplish any of the following purposes, among others:

(a) Publicize the positive contribution of California’s fishing industry and its people as providers of fresh, wholesome seafood products.

(b) Educate the public to the value of California seafood as high quality, nutritious, and desirable.

(c) Ensure the long-term availability of California-caught commercial seafood products by working with public and private organizations to preserve, protect, and enhance aquatic habitat and species.

(d) Enhance the quality of seafood products from fishermen to consumers.

(e) Support research and development to achieve the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 726, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

78526.

No program or activity which is conducted or sponsored pursuant to this chapter shall make false or unwarranted claims, or disparage the quality, value, use, or sale of any commodity authorized by law to be marketed in this state. No program or activity shall be conducted with reference to a private brand or trade name which refers to seafood and seafood products from the California commercial fisheries.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1151, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

78527.

The council shall not expend council funds for advertising brand name seafood products as determined by the council, except for promotions carried out on behalf of the council in markets outside of the State of California. The council may expend council funds to conduct cost-sharing advertising with nonbrand name seafood products from the California commercial fisheries.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1172, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Financial Provisions [78550. - 78564.]

78550.

In order to carry out the programs and administer the activities that are conducted pursuant to this chapter, except as specified in Section 78557, a fee shall be established by the director and, thereafter, shall be recommended to the director by the council, based on an amount which is four-tenths of 1 percent of the ex-vessel price per pound paid for each pound of fish or shellfish specified in subdivision (a) of Section 78407 sold to a receiver, or sold by a fisherman directly to the public pursuant to Section 8033.5 of the Fish and Game Code. The fee shall be paid by the receiver or the fisherman, or both, and remitted to the director as specified in Section 78552. The amount of the fee for each species shall be established annually by the council for recommendation to the director, calculated to the nearest 110,000 of one cent ($0.0001) based on the formulation in this section. Individual fees shall be established for species identified in subdivision (a) of Section 78407. The council, with assistance from the Department of Fish and Game, may determine the fee structure for individual species and may average or consolidate fees for similar species to simplify landing fee reporting and accounting requirements. The amount of the fee shall be based on the landed weight of the fish or shellfish, as reported on the fish landing receipt made under Section 8043 of the Fish and Game Code. A fisherman selling to the public pursuant to Section 8033.5 of the Fish and Game Code shall remit the fee directly to the director as specified in Section 78552.

To facilitate collection of fees from receivers or fishermen who handle a small volume of fish and shellfish specified in subdivision (a) of Section 78407, receivers or fishermen whose estimated monthly fee payments do not exceed ten dollars ($10) may file reports and submit fees on a quarterly basis. Payments are delinquent if not submitted within 60 days following the end of the quarter in which they are due.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1172, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

78551.

The fisherman and the receiver shall each pay one-half of the fee established pursuant to Section 78550 for each pound of fish landed. If the fishermen vote, pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with Section 78575), not to participate in the council, a fisherman is not required to pay any fees pursuant to this chapter. If the receivers vote, pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with Section 78575), not to participate in the council, a receiver is not required to pay any fees pursuant to this chapter. If either fishermen or receivers, but not both, vote in favor of the council, the fee charged the group voting in favor of the council shall not exceed one-half of the fee established pursuant to Section 78550.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1151, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

78552.

The fees, whether from fishermen or receivers, or both, that are collected pursuant to this article shall be forwarded by the receivers, except as provided under Section 78552.5, directly to the council on behalf of the secretary. The administrative office of the council shall supply forms necessary for the remittance of the fees. The secretary may consult with the Director of Fish and Wildlife and enter into agreements with the Department of Fish and Wildlife, when he or she deems it necessary and reasonable, to assist in the administration of this article and to ensure compliance with this article. The secretary and the Director of Fish and Wildlife may enter into an interagency agreement on behalf of the council to provide names and addresses of commercial fish businesses selected annually by the Department of Fish and Wildlife for fish landing fee examinations. The listing of names and addresses is a confidential document.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 26, Sec. 41.   (SB 92)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

78552.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, in any calendar year in which a fisherman who is selling to the public lands, or a receiver receives, less than 10,000 pounds in the aggregate of fish or shellfish in all fisheries combined or for which the annual fees that would otherwise be due by that fisherman or receiver to the council for those fish or shellfish totals less than twenty-five dollars ($25), the fisherman selling to the public or the receiver shall not pay any fees pursuant to this chapter.

(b) In any calendar year in which a fisherman who is selling to the public lands, or a receiver receives, 10,000 pounds or more in the aggregate of fish or shellfish in all fisheries combined, or for which the annual fees that are due by that fisherman or receiver to the council for those fish or shellfish totals twenty-five dollars ($25) or more, the fisherman selling to the public or the receiver shall remit the fees on or before February 28 of the year following the landing or receipt. Any fees that are not received on or before February 28 of the year following the landing or receipt of fish or shellfish for which the fees are due is delinquent and subject to collection pursuant to Section 78554.

(c) If, in any calendar year, a fisherman lands less than 10,000 pounds in the aggregate of fish or shellfish in all fisheries combined, and has paid fees to the council, the fisherman may apply for a refund of the amount paid, not to exceed a total of twenty-five dollars ($25). An application for refund shall be submitted on a form supplied by the council and shall include documentation in the form of landing receipts submitted to the Department of Fish and Game pursuant to Section 8046 of the Fish and Game Code for all species landed and proof of fees paid. Applications for refunds shall be received at the council office on or before March 31 of the year following the landing or receipt of fish or shellfish for which the fees were paid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 726, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

78553.

(a) Each receiver who is required by this chapter to pay a fee or collect a fee from fishermen shall maintain a complete and accurate record of all transactions subject to the fee. These records shall contain any information required by the director relating to the collection of fees, shall be preserved for a period of three years, and shall be available for review upon demand by the director or the director’s duly authorized agent.

(b) Any information obtained by the director or the director’s duly authorized agent from inspection or audit of records shall be confidential and shall not be disclosed except when required in a judicial proceeding.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1151, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

78554.

(a) The collection of funds from anyone who does not pay or remit fees due and payable shall be conducted as follows:

(1) Pursuant to Section 8053 of the Fish and Game Code.

(2) When the secretary makes a determination that fees due pursuant to this chapter are deficient, the secretary may determine the amount of the deficiency, including any applicable penalty. Section 59234.5 shall apply to deficiency determinations made pursuant to this section.

(3) This subdivision is supplemental to any other provisions for collection and imposition of fees and penalties provided by this chapter. In lieu of proceeding pursuant to this section, the secretary may file a complaint for collection of unpaid fees as provided by law.

(b) A person who violates any provision of this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor, and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) or more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), by imprisonment in the county jail for not less than 10 days or more than six months, or by both that fine and imprisonment. Each violation during any day is a separate offense.

(c) A person who violates any provision of this chapter is liable civilly in an amount of not more than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for each violation. Each violation during any day is a separate offense.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 726, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

78555.

Every claim or refund for credit for overpayment of fees shall be in writing and shall state the specific ground upon which the claim is based.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1151, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

78556.

Sections 8058 to 8070, inclusive, of the Fish and Game Code apply to claims for overpayment of fees to the secretary. For purposes of this section, “department,” as used in those sections, means the Department of Food and Agriculture, and “landing fee” means the fees imposed pursuant to this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 26, Sec. 42.   (SB 92)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

78557.

One year after the establishment of the council, the council may recommend to the secretary an increase over and above four-tenths of 1 percent of the price per pound paid to the fisherman for each pound of fish or shellfish specified in subdivision (a) of Section 78407 for the council to carry out its duties under this chapter. The council shall consider the budget for the council, funding for activities conducted pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 78525), as well as the market prices of seafood landed in California, landing fees imposed by the Department of Fish and Wildlife, and any other relevant factor affecting the economics of the fisheries. The council shall, in making any determination to increase fees, consult with fishermen and receivers and, if the recommended increase would exceed eight-tenths of 1 percent of the market price per pound paid to the fisherman for each pound of fish or shellfish sold, conduct a ballot poll of the fishermen and receivers on the secretary’s list established pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with Section 78575). The secretary may not increase any fee without the approval of two-thirds the voting members of the council.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 26, Sec. 43.   (SB 92)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

78558.

(a) All money that is collected by the council pursuant to this chapter shall be deposited in any bank, or other depository that is approved by the Director of Finance, allocated to the purposes of this chapter only, and disbursed by the council, upon approval of the secretary, only for the necessary expenses that are incurred by the council and the secretary in carrying out the purposes and provisions of this chapter, including expenses generated by the auditing requirement contained in this section. Money that is so collected shall be deposited and disbursed in conformity with appropriate auditing regulations adopted by the secretary. The expenditure of the money is exempt from Sections 925.6 and 16304 of the Government Code.

(b) All expenditures by the council and the secretary shall be audited at least once every two years by one of the following means:

(1) By contract with a certified public accountant.

(2) By contract with a public accountant holding a valid permit issued by the California Board of Accountancy.

(3) By contract with a public accounting firm.

(4) By agreement with the Department of Finance.

(c) A copy of the audit shall be delivered by the auditor to the council within 30 days after completion of the audit. Upon receipt, the council shall deliver a copy of the audit to the Governor, the secretary, the Controller, and to any member of the public requesting a copy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1055, Sec. 23.   Effective September 30, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

78559.

Money that is deposited pursuant to Section 78558 may be invested and reinvested by the council in any of the securities described in Article 1 (commencing with Section 16430) of Chapter 3 of Part 2 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 726, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

78560.

The director, after consultation with the council, shall adopt an annual budget which sets forth the proposed expenditures which the director deems necessary for the performance by him or her and by the department of the duties which are imposed upon the director and the department by this chapter. The director shall also prepare and submit to the council an annual statement of the director’s expenditures pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1151, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

78560.5.

The council may allocate a percentage of the contribution from one or a series of species and gear types to conduct species and gear specific programs. In developing specific programs, the council may form advisory committees comprised of harvesters and processors whose primary income is derived from the species considered for specific programs. The funds expended for any program directly benefiting a specific gear type or species of fish or shellfish shall not exceed that proportion of funds expended for general programs benefiting all the species and gear types under this chapter during each five-year term of the council. Proportional funding of species specific programs shall not be required in the annual budget for the year in which the program is first adopted, but proportional funding shall be required in the budget for each subsequent year that each such program is included in the annual budget.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1151, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

78561.

To the extent that programs for specific species of fish or shellfish are included in the budget, as opposed to programs to benefit generally all the species covered by this chapter, there shall be reflected in that same year’s budget, or in budgets prepared for the following years, programs for other species of fish and shellfish covered under this chapter. The funds expended pursuant to the council’s budget for any program for a specific species of fish and shellfish shall be in the same proportion, based on the fees collected from that species of fish or shellfish, as that expended for each of the other species of fish and shellfish covered under this chapter. Proportional funding of species-specific programs are not required in the annual budget for the year in which the program is first adopted, but proportional funding shall be required in the budget for each subsequent year that each such program is included in the annual budget.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1151, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

78563.

The secretary may accept contributions from any source or may receive grants or contracts for funds pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 35062 of the Public Resources Code to advance the purposes of this chapter. If requested by the donor, the contributions shall be segregated and separately maintained for the use of the council. The secretary may also establish categories of voluntary contributions paid by sponsors, as defined by Section 78415. Categories of voluntary contributions, suggested voluntary contributions, and benefits may be recommended to the secretary by the council.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 726, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

78564.

The council may develop guidelines for the establishment and operation of a “credit-back” program for receivers and fishermen, which authorizes the reimbursement of a percentage of individual contributions to the council, not to exceed 50 percent, for specified individual expenditures benefiting the fishing industry. Individual expenditures eligible for reimbursement may include, but are not necessarily limited to, promotion, research and development, and advertising. The council shall appoint a review committee from its membership and from the fishing industry to review and approve applications for the credit. Any guidelines that require the assistance of, or impact the operation of, the Department of Fish and Game are subject to Section 78552.

Upon submittal of a statement of completion of a credit-back program, and its acceptance by the review committee, the review committee may direct the council to reimburse a percentage of individual contributions, not to exceed 50 percent, at the end of the fiscal year for which the credit-back application and expenditure were made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1172, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Implementation, Voting Procedure, and Termination [78575. - 78588.]

78575.

On or before February 1, 1991, the director shall establish a list of receivers and fishermen eligible to vote on the implementation of this chapter. In establishing the list, the director may request, in writing, the assistance of the Director of Fish and Game and associations representing fishermen or receivers in gathering the names of all fishermen and receivers who sold or received specified seafood species landed the previous season. The list shall be filed within 30 days following receipt of the written notice from the director. All information on the volume of landings shall be kept confidential.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1151, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

78576.

Any fisherman or receiver whose name does not appear on the director’s list of receivers may have his or her name included on the list by filing with the director a signed statement, identifying himself or herself as a fisherman or receiver and furnishing evidence of having sold or received landings the previous year through the submission of receipts prepared under Section 8043 of the Fish and Game Code. The failure to include a fisherman’s or a receiver’s name on the list does not exempt a fisherman or a receiver from paying assessments under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1151, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

78577.

This chapter, except as necessary to conduct a referendum vote under this article, shall not apply to a fishery defined in subdivision (c) of Section 78407 until the secretary conducts and finds in the referendum that either:

(a) At least 40 percent or more of the total number of fishermen from the list established by the secretary pursuant to Section 78582 have participated by voting in the referendum, and the secretary finds either of the following:

(1) Sixty-five percent or more of the fishermen who voted in the referendum, who landed in California 51 percent or more of the species in the fishery defined in subdivision (c) of Section 78407 that is the subject of the referendum in the previous year, voted in favor of implementing this chapter for that fishery.

(2) Fifty-one percent of the fishermen who voted in the referendum, who landed in California 65 percent or more of the species in the fishery defined in subdivision (c) of Section 78407 that is the subject of the referendum in the previous year, voted in favor of implementing this chapter for that fishery.

(b) Forty percent or more of the total number of receivers from the list established by the secretary pursuant to Section 78582 have participated by voting in the referendum, and the secretary finds either of the following:

(1) Sixty-five percent or more of the receivers, who received 51 percent or more of the species in the fishery defined in subdivision (c) of Section 78407 that is the subject of the referendum landed in California in the previous year, voted in favor of implementing this chapter for that species.

(2) Fifty-one percent or more of the receivers, who received 65 percent or more of the fish of the species in the fishery defined in subdivision (c) of Section 78407 that is the subject of the referendum landed in California in the previous year, voted in favor of implementing this chapter for that species.

(c) If both lists of fishermen and receivers vote in favor of the implementation of this chapter, the secretary shall add, by regulation, the fishery to the fisheries subject to this chapter, and both fishermen and receivers shall be subject to assessment pursuant to this article. If only fishermen or receivers, but not both, vote in favor of implementation of this chapter, the secretary shall add, by regulation, the fishery to the fisheries subject to this chapter, however, only the group voting in favor of that implementation shall be subject to the fees imposed pursuant to Sections 78550 to 78557, inclusive.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 726, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

78578.

The secretary shall establish a period in which to conduct the referendum which shall not be less than 30 days or more than 60 days in duration, and may prescribe additional procedures as necessary to conduct the referendum. If the initial period established is less than 60 days, the secretary may extend that period. However, the total referendum period may not exceed 60 days.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 726, Sec. 22.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

78579.

(a) Unless funds are otherwise provided by the Secretary for Environmental Protection, before the referendum vote is conducted by the secretary, the proponents of the council shall deposit with the secretary the amount that the secretary determines is necessary to defray the expenses of preparing the necessary lists and information and conducting the referendum vote.

(b) Any funds not used in carrying out this article shall be returned to the proponents of the council who deposited the funds with the secretary.

(c) Upon the establishment of the council, the council may reimburse the proponents of the council for any
 funds deposited by the proponents with the secretary that were used in carrying out this article, and for any legal expenses and costs incurred in establishing the council.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 179.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Note: See this section as modified on July 17, 1991, in Governor's Reorganization Plan No. 1 of 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

78580.

The nonreceipt of a ballot by any fisherman or receiver shall not invalidate a referendum.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1151, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

78581.

(a) If the director finds that a favorable vote has been given, the director shall certify and give notice of the favorable vote to all receivers whose names and addresses are on file with the director.

(b) If the director finds that a favorable vote has not been given, the director shall so certify and declare this chapter inoperative. The director shall also notify the appropriate policy committees in both the Assembly and Senate that the chapter is inoperative.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1151, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

78582.

Fisheries for fish and shellfish species excepted by subdivision (a) of Section 78407 and not previously included in the list of fisheries subject to this chapter may be added to the fisheries subject to this chapter, including the payment of fees pursuant to Sections 78550 to 78557, inclusive, upon receipt by the secretary of a written request by proponents for inclusion, who shall represent either fishermen or receivers, or both, who are engaged in the fishery proposed for inclusion. The fishery shall be included under this chapter after all of the following occur:

(a) The council recommends to the secretary the inclusion of the fishery, subject to the request by proponents for inclusion.

(b) Unless alternative funding is recommended by the council, the proponents for inclusion deposit funds with the secretary in an amount the secretary determines is necessary to defray the expenses of preparing necessary lists and information and conducting inclusion referenda votes of fishermen or receivers, or both, engaged in the fishery proposed for inclusion.

(c) A list of fishermen or receivers, or both, engaged in the fishery proposed for inclusion is established. The secretary shall establish a list not later than 60 days after the earlier of the following:

(1) The receipt of the deposit pursuant to subdivision (b).

(2) The receipt on an accurate list from the council.

(d) An inclusion referendum, which is not more than 60 days in duration is conducted within 90 days following the receipt of the deposit pursuant to subdivision (b) or the receipt of an accurate list from the council, whichever is earlier, under the regulations that the secretary established, consistent with all other provisions for carrying out a referendum under this chapter.

(e) A favorable vote, consistent with the percentage requirements of Section 78577 for a favorable vote of either fishermen or receivers, or both, engaged in the fishery proposed for inclusion and eligible to vote, is received.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 726, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

78583.

Fisheries for species of fish and shellfish, that are subject to this chapter pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 78407 that are added to the list of fisheries subject to this chapter pursuant to Section 78582, shall be treated the same as all other species of fish and shellfish subject to this chapter, and fishermen and receivers engaged in the fishery of that included species shall be appointed to the council in accordance with subdivision (e) of Section 78476.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 726, Sec. 24.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

78584.

(a) Between January 1, 1996, and February 28, 1996, and in the same period each five years thereafter, or pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 78578, the director shall, by the public hearing procedure, and if appropriate, the review referendum procedure provided for in Sections 78585 and 78586, determine whether the council program provided for in this chapter shall continue in effect.

(b) If the director finds from evidence received at the hearing that a substantial question exists as to whether the council program is contrary to or does not effectuate the declared purposes or provisions of this chapter or receives in writing a referendum petition with the signatures of 25 percent or more of the number of fishermen or receivers, as evidenced by receipts prepared under Section 8043 of the Fish and Game Code, the council program shall be submitted to referendum as provided in Section 78585.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1151, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

78585.

If the secretary determines that a review referendum procedure is appropriate or, pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 78584, required, the secretary shall establish a referendum period of not to exceed 30 days during which period ballots shall be submitted to every fisherman or receiver on official membership lists in the possession of the council and the department. If the secretary determines that the referendum period does not provide sufficient time for the balloting, the secretary may extend the referendum for an additional period not to exceed 30 days. The ballots shall provide a “yes” or “no” voting alternative to the following question:

“Shall the California Seafood Council be continued for the next five fiscal years commencing April 1, following this referendum?”

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 726, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

78586.

If the council program is submitted to a review referendum under Section 78585, the director shall find that fishermen or receivers statewide have approved the council program if the director finds either of the following:

(1) Sixty-five percent or more of the fishermen who voted in the review referendum, who landed in California 51 percent or more of the fish of the species listed in subdivision (a) of Section 78407 in the previous fiscal year, approve the program; or 51 percent or more of the fishermen, who landed in California 65 percent or more of the fish of the species listed in subdivision (a) of Section 78407 in the previous fiscal year, approve the program.

(2) Sixty-five percent or more of the receivers who voted in the review referendum, who received 51 percent or more of the fish of the species listed in subdivision (a) of Section 78407 landed in California in the previous fiscal year, approve the program; or 51 percent or more of the receivers, who received 65 percent or more of the fish of the species listed in subdivision (a) of Section 78407 landed in California in the previous fiscal year, approve the program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1151, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

78587.

If the director finds that only the fishermen or only the receivers vote to approve the program in a review referendum, the director shall reconstitute the council pursuant to Section 78477. To reduce the membership on the council of either the fishermen or the receivers, whichever did not vote to approve the program, the director shall conduct a lottery of those choosing to remain from the nonapproval group to determine who shall remain on the council.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1151, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

78588.

On the termination of the council pursuant to this article, the council shall remain in existence until the end of the marketing season then current for the purpose of furnishing the secretary with a complete record of its outstanding financial obligations. The secretary shall pay from the money collected pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 78550) any outstanding obligations and any obligations incurred by the secretary and the department under this section. Any money that remains shall be retained by the secretary to defray the expenses of formulation, issuance, administration, or enforcement of any subsequent program for seafood promotion. If no seafood promotion program is undertaken within a period of three years from the date of termination of the council, that money shall be withdrawn from the approved depository and paid into the special account for enhancement and restoration programs established pursuant to Section 7861 of the Fish and Game Code. The secretary may also specifically designate any money that remains for expenditure for research on commercial fishery resources or fisheries, the improvement of commercial fishery resources or fisheries, or both.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 726, Sec. 26.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 24. California Tomato Commission [78601. - 78725.]



  ARTICLE 1. Declaration and General Provisions [78601. - 78611.]

78601.
